District of Columbia statutes.
16-2344

Exclusion of public.

Upon trial or proceedings over which the Division has jurisdiction under paragraph (3), (4), (10), or (11) of section 11-1101 , the court may exclude the general public and, at the request of either party, shall exclude the general public.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 592, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 544, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2344.
1973 Ed., § 16-2344.